Louisiana, session 2026, SB266.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:23.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§23.5. Judicial review of a statutory requirement for an occupation license
A petition may be filed in a court of competent jurisdiction to request
judicial review of a statutory requirement for an occupational license to
determine whether the statutory requirement burdens entry into a profession,
trade, or occupation and whether the statutory requirement is necessary and
narrowly tailored to fulfill legitimate fiduciary, public health, safety, or welfare
objectives.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-470 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 266